Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1518
Writ; service; notice.

Any writ issued pursuant to section 50-1517 shall be served without delay on the election commissioner or county clerk by the sheriff of his or her county. The election commissioner or county clerk shall at once fix a day, not more than thirty calendar days after the date of the receipt of such writ, on which he or she will proceed to open such ballots and shall cause notice in writing of the day so fixed to be served on the petitioner or his or her attorney and the respondent member or his or her attorney at least five calendar days before such day. Such notice may be served in the manner provided in section 25-505.01.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 25.